Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 13. Boilers and Pressure Vessels.

§§ 59.1-168 through 59.1-176.

Repealed by Acts 1972, c. 237.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to regulation of boilers and pressure vessels, see §

40.1-51.5

et seq.

For current provisions as to standards pertaining to existing installations, see §

40.1-51.7

.